Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5946.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-27.3 of the General Laws entitled "State Building Code" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-27.3-703. Construction fencing safeguards.
(a) In addition to any standard, practice or procedure relating to safeguards to be used in
and around construction sites promulgated by this code, during work hours it shall be a violation
of this section for any owner, operator or manager of a construction project on a construction site
whether on public or private property, to cause, permit or authorize the site to be secured by a
locked chain, gate, fence or other barrier designed to obstruct access in or out of the construction
site by vehicle or person on foot. At all times while construction is taking place on worksite, an
access point shall remain open so that employees working on the site have the ability to freely enter
and exit.
(b) Violations of this section shall, for a first offense, be punishable by a written warning
to the operators of the construction site with an order to open or unlock whatever barrier is in place;
subsequent violations of this section shall result in an immediate stoppage of work on the site until
a hearing is scheduled with the director of the department of labor and training and a one thousand
dollar ($1,000) fine for each day the construction site was found to have been locked without an
open access point for workers to freely enter and exit.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001898/SUB A
========
LC001898/SUB A - Page 2 of 3